ko: 리드 유형: 찬터 리드; 겹리드; 드론 리드; 혼합/다중 리드 유형 세트; 혼합/다양; 레귤레이터 리드; 홑리드; 기타
pt-BR: Palheta tipo: Palheta de ponteira; Palheta dupla; Palhetas de bordão; Misto/conjunto inclui vários tipos de palheta; Misto/variado; Palhetas do regulador; Palheta simples; Outro
ro-RO: Tipul de ancie: Ancie de chanter; Ancie dublă; Ancii de ison; Mixt/Setul include mai multe tipuri de ancii; Mixt/variază; Ancii de regulator; Ancie simplă; Altele
de: Rohrblatttyp: Spielpfeifen-Rohrblatt; Doppelrohrblatt; Bordun-Rohrblätter; Gemischt/Set enthält mehrere Rohrblattarten; Gemischt/variiert; Regulator-Rohrblätter; Einfaches Rohrblatt; Sonstige
bg-BG: Тип пискун: Писък за гайдуница; Двойна пластина; Писъци за ручило; Смесени/Комплектът включва няколко типа; Смесени/различни; Писъци за регулатори; Единична пластина; Други
es: Tipo de lengüeta: Lengüeta de puntero; Doble lengüeta; Lengüetas de roncón; Mixto/el set incluye varios tipos de lengüeta; Mixto/variable; Lengüetas de regulador; Lengüeta simple; Otro
el: Τύπος καλαμιού: Καλάμι chanter; Διπλό καλάμι; Καλάμια drone; Μεικτό/Το σετ περιλαμβάνει πολλαπλούς τύπους καλαμιών; Μεικτό/διαφέρει; Καλάμια ρυθμιστή; Μονό καλάμι; Άλλο
en: Reed type: Chanter reed; Double reed; Drone reeds; Mixed/Set includes multiple reed types; Mixed/varies; Regulator reeds; Single reed; Other
it: Tipo a canna: Ancia del chanter; Doppia ancia; Ance del bordone; Misto/il set include più tipi di ancia; Misto/variabile; Ance dei regolatori; Ancia singola; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de palheta: Palheta do ponteiro; Palheta dupla; Palhetas do bordão; Misto/conjunto inclui vários tipos de palheta; Misto/variável; Palhetas de regulador; Palheta simples; Outro
fi: Ruokopillin tyyppi: Melodiapillin ruoko; Kaksoislehdykkä; Bordunaruo'ot; Sekoitettu / setti sisältää useita ruokotyyppejä; Sekoitettu/vaihteleva; Säätöruo'ot; Yksittäislehdykkä; Muu
sv: Typ av rörblad: Rörblad till melodipipa; Dubbelt rörblad; Rörblad till bordun; Blandade/setet innehåller flera typer av rörblad; Blandat/varierande; Rörblad till regulator; Enkelt rörblad; Övrigt
zh-TW: 簧片類型: 旋律管簧片; 雙簧片; 和聲管簧片; 混合/套組包含多種簧片類型; 混合/多變; 調節管簧片; 單簧片; 其他
zh-CN: 风笛簧片类型: 主奏管簧片; 双簧; 和音管簧片; 混合/包含多种簧片类型的套装; 混合/多种; 调节管簧片; 单簧; 其他
sk-SK: Typ jazýčka: Chanterový plátok; Dvojitý plátok; Burdónové plátky; Zmiešané/Súprava obsahuje viacero typov plátkov; Zmiešané/rôzne; Regulátorové plátky; Jednoduchý plátok; Iné
cs: Typ jazýčku: Plátek melodické píšťaly; Dvojitý plátek; Plátky bordunové píšťaly; Smíšené / Sada obsahuje více typů plátků; Smíšené / Různé; Plátky regulátorů; Jednoduchý plátek; Ostatní
hu: Sípnyelv típusa: Dallamsíp nád; Dupla nád; Bordunsíp nádak; Vegyes / A készlet többféle nádat tartalmaz; Vegyes/változó; Regulátor nádak; Szimpla nád; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta piska: Melodijski jeziček; Dvojni jeziček; Bronski jezički; Mešano/komplet vključuje več vrst jezičkov; Mešano/se razlikuje; Jezički za regulatorje; Enojni jeziček; Drugo
fr: Type d’anche: Anche de chanter; Anche double; Anches de bourdon; Mixte/L'ensemble comprend plusieurs types d'anches; Mixte/variable; Anches de régulateur; Anche simple; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta trske: Jezičac za prebiraljku; Dvostruki jezičac; Jezičci za trubnjeve; Miješano / Komplet uključuje više vrsta jezičaka; Miješano/različito; Jezičci za regulatore; Jednostruki jezičac; Ostalo
nl: Riet type: Melodieriet; Dubbelriet; Bourdonrieten; Gemengd/set bevat meerdere rietsoorten; Gemengd/varieert; Regulatorrieten; Enkelriet; Overig
lt-LT: Liežuvėlio tipas: Melodinio vamzdžio liežuvėlis; Dvigubas liežuvėlis; Burdono liežuvėliai; Mišrus / rinkinyje yra kelių tipų liežuvėliai; Mišrus / įvairus; Reguliatoriaus liežuvėliai; Viengubas liežuvėlis; Kitas
pl: Typ stroika: Stroik przebierki; Stroik podwójny; Stroiki burdonowe; Mieszany/zestaw zawiera wiele typów stroików; Mieszane/różne; Stroiki regulatorów; Stroik pojedynczy; Inne
tr: Kamış tipi: Melodi borusu kamışı; Çift kamış; Dem ses kamışları; Karışık/Set birden fazla kamış türü içerir; Karışık/değişken; Regülatör kamışları; Tek kamış; Diğer
da: Rørtbladype: Chanter-rørblad; Dobbelt rørblad; Bordun-rørblade; Blandet/Sættet indeholder flere typer rørblade; Blandet/varierer; Regulator-rørblade; Enkelt rørblad; Andet
th: ประเภทของลิ้นเป่า: ลิ้นปี่; ลิ้นคู่; ลิ้นโดรน; ผสม/ชุดประกอบด้วยลิ้นหลายประเภท; ผสม/หลากหลาย; ลิ้นเรกูเลเตอร์; ลิ้นเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại lưỡi gà: Dăm kèn giai điệu; Dăm kép; Dăm kèn bè; Hỗn hợp/Bộ gồm nhiều loại dăm kèn; Hỗn hợp/khác nhau; Dăm kèn điều chỉnh; Dăm đơn; Khác
ru: Тип трости: Трость для чантера; Двойная трость; Трости для дронов; Смешанный/Набор включает несколько типов тростей; Смешанный/варьируется; Трости для регуляторов; Одинарная трость; Другое
nb: Rørbladtype: Spillerør; Dobbelt rørblad; Bordunrør; Blandet / settet inneholder flere rørtyper; Blandet / varierer; Regulator-rørblad; Enkelt rørblad; Annet
ja: リードタイプ: チャンターリード; ダブルリード; ドローンリード; 混合/複数のリードタイプを含むセット; 混合/さまざま; レギュレーターリード; シングルリード; その他